Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1820
Director; provide for inspection and grading services; expense.

The director may, upon written request of any potato grower, provide for inspection and grading services for commercial shipments of potatoes in areas where compulsory inspection and grading are not in force. In all such cases, the inspection and grading service shall be at the expense of the potato grower requesting the same and shall be determined in the manner prescribed in section 2-1816.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 12, p. 190.